Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,158.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,158.01 to 81-15,165 shall be known and may be cited as the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1034, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 495, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB1101, § 1.